North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160B. Consolidated City-County Act.
Article 2. Defining Urban Service Districts.

§ 160B-3.
Authority; purpose; administration.

The governing board may define any number of urban service districts in order to finance, provide or maintain for the districts services, facilities and functions in addition to or to a greater extent than those financed, provided, or maintained for the entire consolidated city-county.

The powers, duties, functions, rights, privileges, and immunities of an urban service district shall be exercised or administered by the governing board of the consolidated city-county. Any revenues, distributions, or other funds due an urban service district shall be paid to the governing board of the consolidated city-county.

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 646, ss. 22(a), 22(b).

Editor’s Note.

Subsection (b) of this section was formerly subsection (c) of

G.S. 160B-4

. It was recodified as subsection (b) of this section by Session Laws 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 646, s. 22.

§ 160B-4.
Definition of urban service districts to replace municipalities abolished at the time of consolidation.

The governing board, by resolution, may define an urban service district within the boundaries of the largest municipality that existed in the county before consolidation and within the boundaries of any other municipality abolished at the time of the establishment of the consolidated city-county. Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 160B-7

, the resolution may also define an urban service district to include areas proposed for inclusion in an urban service district and identified in a plan for consolidation prepared by a consolidation study commission pursuant to Article 20 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes or a plan approved by the General Assembly. Any urban service district so defined shall comprise the total area of the abolished municipality as it existed immediately before the effective date of consolidation. As determined by the governing board, the resolution shall take effect as to the areas included therein either upon its adoption or at the beginning of a fiscal year commencing after its passage.

Prior to the effective date of consolidation, an interim governing board of a consolidated city-county by resolution may define an urban service district. The resolution defining the urban service district shall take effect upon the effective date of the consolidation.

Recodified as § 160B-3(b) by Session Laws 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 646, s. 22(a).

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1; 1995, c. 461, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 646, s. 22(a).

§ 160B-5.
Definition of urban service districts to replace municipalities abolished subsequent to consolidation.

The governing board, by resolution, may define an urban service district within the boundaries of any municipality within the consolidated city-county the citizens of which, subsequent to the establishment of the consolidated city-county, have voted in a referendum to abolish their municipality and consolidate its powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities with those of the consolidated city-county. An urban service district so defined shall comprise the total area of the municipality as it existed immediately before the effective date of its abolition. The resolution shall take effect at the beginning of the fiscal year next occurring after its adoption.

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1.

§ 160B-6.
Definition of urban service districts where no municipality existed.

Standards. — The governing board, by resolution, may define an urban service district upon finding that a proposed district:

Has a resident population of at least 1,000;

Has a resident population density of at least one person per acre;

Has an assessed valuation of at least two and one-half million dollars ($2,500,000);

Requires one or more of the services, facilities and functions that are provided or maintained only or to a greater extent for an urban service district; and

Does not include any territory within an active incorporated municipality.

Report. — Prior to the public hearing required by subsection (c), the consolidated city-county shall prepare a report containing:

A map of the proposed district, showing its proposed boundaries;

A statement showing that the proposed district meets the standards of subsection (a); and

A plan for providing urban services, facilities and functions for the district.The report shall be available in the office of the clerk of the consolidated city-county for at least two weeks prior to the date of the public hearing.

Hearing and Notice. — The governing board shall hold a public hearing prior to adoption of any resolution defining a new urban service district. Notice of the hearing shall state the date, hour and place of the hearing and its subject, and shall include a statement that the report required by subsection (b) is available for inspection in the office of the clerk of the consolidated city-county. The notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least once and not less than one week prior to the date of the hearing. In addition it shall be mailed at least four weeks prior to the date of the hearing to the owners as shown by the tax records of the consolidated city-county of all property located within the proposed district. The person designated by the governing board to mail the notice shall certify to the governing board that the mailing has been completed and his certificate shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud. The hearing may be held within the proposed district.

Effective Date. — The resolution defining an urban service district shall take effect at the beginning of a fiscal year commencing after its passage, as determined by the governing board.

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1.

§ 160B-7.
Extension of urban service districts.

Standards. — The governing board, by resolution, may extend by annexation the boundaries of any urban service district upon finding that:

The area to be annexed is contiguous to the district, with at least one eighth of the area’s aggregate external boundary coincident with the existing boundary of the district;

The area to be annexed has a resident population density of at least one person per acre and an assessed valuation of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) per resident person; or the area to be annexed is so developed that at least sixty per cent (60%) of the total number of lots and tracts in the area at the time of annexation are used for residential, commercial, industrial, institutional or governmental purposes and at least sixty percent (60%) of the total acreage of the area at the time of annexation is devoted to these uses; and

The area to be annexed requires the services, facilities or functions that are provided for the contiguous urban service district.

Annexation by Petition. — The governing board also, by resolution, may extend by annexation the boundaries of any urban service district when one hundred percent (100%) of the real property owners of the area to be annexed have petitioned the governing board for annexation to the service district.

Report. — Prior to the public hearing required by subsection (d), the consolidated city-county shall prepare a report containing:

A map of the urban service district and the adjacent territory, showing the present and proposed boundaries of the district;

A statement showing that the area to be annexed meets the standards of subsection (a) or comes before the governing board by petition as provided by subsection (b); and

A plan for extending urban services, facilities and functions to the area to be annexed.The report shall be available in the office of the clerk of the consolidated city-county for at least two weeks prior to the date for the public hearing.

Hearing and Notice. — The governing board shall hold a public hearing prior to adoption of any resolution extending the boundaries of an urban service district. Notice of the hearing shall state the date, hour and place of the hearing and its subject, and shall include a statement that the report required by subsection (c) is available for inspection in the office of the clerk of the consolidated city-county. Notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least once and not less than one week prior to the date of the hearing. In addition notice shall be mailed at least four weeks prior to the date of the hearing to the owners as shown by the tax records of the consolidated city-county of all property located within the area to be annexed. The person designated by the governing board to mail the notice shall certify to the governing board that the mailing has been completed, and his certificate shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud.

(d1)

Alternative Notice. —

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of this section, first-class mail notice shall not be required where a plan for consolidation prepared by a consolidation study committee pursuant to Article 20 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes or a plan approved by the General Assembly proposed to include the area under consideration for annexation within an urban service district.

Effective Date. — The resolution extending the boundaries of the district shall take effect at the beginning of a fiscal year commencing after its passage, as determined by the governing board.

A consolidated city-county may not utilize the procedures of this section to annex to an urban service district territory within the boundaries of an active incorporated municipality.

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1; 1995, c. 461, s. 3.

§ 160B-8.
Consolidation of urban service districts.

Standards. — The governing board, by resolution, may consolidate two or more urban service districts upon finding that:

The districts are contiguous or are in a continuous boundary; and

The provision or maintenance of urban services, facilities and functions for each of the districts is substantially the same; or

If the provision or maintenance of urban services, facilities and functions is lower for one of the districts, there is a need to increase those services, facilities and functions for that district. However, no urban service district providing electric or telephone services may be consolidated with any other urban service district unless the voters of the district providing these utility services approve the consolidation in a referendum held for that purpose. Any consolidated city-county may hold these referendums.

Report. — Prior to the public hearing required by subsection (c), the consolidated city-county shall prepare a report containing:

A map of the districts to be consolidated;

A statement showing the proposed consolidation meets the standards of subsection (a); and

If necessary, a plan for increasing the urban services, facilities and functions for one of the districts so that they are substantially the same throughout the consolidated district.The report shall be available in the office of the clerk of the consolidated city-county for at least two weeks prior to the date of the public hearing.

Hearing and Notice. — The governing board shall hold a public hearing prior to adoption of any resolution consolidating urban service districts. Notice of the hearing shall state the date, hour and place of the hearing and its subject, and shall include a statement that the report required by subsection (b) is available for inspection in the office of the clerk of the consolidated city-county. Notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least once and not less than two weeks prior to the date of the hearing. In addition, if the services, facilities and functions for one of the districts will be substantially increased as a result of the consolidation, notice shall be mailed at least four weeks prior to the date of the hearing to the owners as shown by the tax records of the consolidated city-county of all property located within the district. The person designated by the governing board to mail the notice shall certify to the governing board that the mailing has been completed and his certificate shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud.

Effective Date. — The consolidation of urban service districts shall take effect at the beginning of a fiscal year commencing after passage of the resolution of consolidation, as determined by the governing board.

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1.

§ 160B-9.
Required provision or maintenance of services, facilities and functions.

New District. — When a consolidated city-county defines a new urban service district, it shall provide or maintain the services, facilities and functions for which the residents of the district are being taxed within a reasonable time, not to exceed one year, after the effective date of the definition of the district.

Extended District. — When a consolidated city-county annexes territory to an urban service district, it shall provide or maintain the services, facilities and functions provided or maintained throughout the district to the residents of the area annexed to the district within a reasonable time not to exceed one year, after the effective date of the annexation.

Consolidated District. — When a consolidated city-county consolidates two or more urban service districts, one of which has provided or maintained a lower level of urban services, it shall increase the services, facilities and functions within that district to a level comparable to those provided or maintained elsewhere in the consolidated district within a reasonable time, not to exceed one year, after the effective date of the consolidation.

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1.

§ 160B-10.
Abolition of urban service districts.

Upon finding that there is no longer a need for a particular urban service district, the governing board, by resolution, may abolish that district. The governing board shall hold a public hearing prior to adoption of a resolution abolishing a district. Notice of the hearing shall state the date, hour and place of the hearing, and its subject, and shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least once a week for two successive weeks prior to the date of the hearing. The abolition of any urban service district shall take effect at the end of a fiscal year following passage of the resolution, as determined by the governing board.

History.

1973, c. 537, s. 1.